Utah statutes.
59-2-513.   Tax list and duplicate.
The factual details to be shown on the assessor's tax list and duplicate with
respect to land which is being valued, assessed, and taxed under this part are
the same as those set forth by the assessor with respect to other taxable
property in the county.
